Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 2. Scope and Jurisdiction

§ 40-14-120.
Territorial application.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, this act applies to consumer credit transactions made in this state. For purposes of this act, a consumer credit transaction is made in this state if:

A signed writing evidencing the obligation or offer of the consumer is received by the creditor or person acting on behalf of the creditor in this state;

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 124, § 3.

The credit transaction is secured by a dwelling, as defined in W.S. 40-14-640(a), located in Wyoming; or

A consumer who is a resident of this state enters into a consumer credit transaction while in this state with a creditor who has offered or advertised in this state by means, including but not limited to mail brochure, telephone, print, radio, television, internet or other electronic means.

With respect to sales made pursuant to a revolving charge account (W.S.

40-14-208

), this act applies if the buyer’s communication or indication of his intention to establish the account is received by the seller in this state. If no communication or indication of intention is given by the buyer before the first sale, this act applies if the seller’s communication notifying the buyer of the privilege of using the account is mailed or personally delivered in this state.

With respect to loans made pursuant to a lender credit card or similar arrangement (W.S. 40-14-140(a)(ix)), this act applies if the debtor’s communication or indication of his intention to establish the arrangement with the lender is received by the lender in this state. If no communication or indication of intention is given by the debtor before the first loan, this act applies if the lender’s communication notifying the debtor of the privilege of using the arrangement is mailed or personally delivered in this state.

The part on limitations on creditors’ remedies (part 1) of the article on remedies and penalties (article 5) applies to actions or other proceedings brought in this state to enforce rights arising from consumer credit sales, consumer leases, or consumer loans, or extortionate extensions of credit, wherever made.

If a consumer credit sale, consumer lease, or consumer loan, or modification thereof, is made in another state to a person who is a resident of this state when the sale, lease, loan, or modification is made, the following provisions apply as though the transaction occurred in this state:

A seller, lessor, lender, or assignee of his rights, may not collect charges through actions or other proceedings in excess of those permitted by the article on credit sales (article 2) or by the article on loans (article 3); and

A seller, lessor, lender, or assignee of his rights, may not enforce rights against the buyer, lessee, or debtor, with respect to the provisions of agreements which violate the provisions on limitations on agreements and practices (part 4) of the article on credit sales (article 2) or of the article on loans (article 3).

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a sale, lease, loan or modification thereof, made in another state to a person who was not a resident of this state when the sale, lease, loan, or modification was made is valid and enforceable in this state according to its terms to the extent that it is valid and enforceable under the laws of the state applicable to the transaction.

For the purposes of this act, the residence of a buyer, lessee, or debtor is the address given by him as his residence in any writing signed by him in connection with a credit transaction. Until he notifies the creditor of a new or different address, the given address is presumed to be unchanged.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section:

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, this act does not apply if the buyer, lessee, or debtor is not a resident of this state at the time of a credit transaction and the parties then agree that the law of his residence applies; and

This act applies if the buyer, lessee, or debtor is a resident of this state at the time of a credit transaction and the parties then agree that the law of this state applies.

Except as provided in subsection (h) of this section, the following agreements by a buyer, lessee, or debtor are invalid with respect to consumer credit sales, consumer leases, consumer loans, or modifications thereof, to which this act applies:

That the law of another state shall apply;

That the buyer, lessee, or debtor consents to the jurisdiction of another state; and

That fixes venue.

The following provisions of this act specify the applicable law governing certain cases:

Applicability (W.S.

40-14-602

) of the part on powers and functions of administrator (part 1) of the article on administration (article 6); and

Applicability (W.S.

40-14-630

) of the part on notification and fees (part 2) of the article on administration (article 6).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 1-201; W.S. 1957, §

40-1-201

; Laws 1973, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 1988, ch. 49, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2; 2013 ch. 124, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(iii), and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “or person acting on behalf of the creditor” in (a)(i); repealed (a)(ii) which read: “(ii) The creditor induces consumers who are residents of this state to enter into credit transactions by a continuous and systematic solicitation either personally or by mail and the goods or money are delivered in this state and payment is made from this state; or” and added (a)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

§ 40-14-121.
Exclusions.

Except as required by W.S.

40-14-641

, this act does not apply to:

Extensions of credit to government or governmental agencies or instrumentalities;

Except as otherwise provided in the article on insurance [article 4], the sale of insurance by an insurer if the premium is not financed;

Transactions under public utility or common carrier tariffs if a subdivision or agency of this state or of the United States regulates the charges for the services involved, the charges for delayed payment, and any discount allowed for early payment; or

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 62, § 2.

Ceilings on rates and charges or limits on loan maturities of a credit union organized under the laws of this state or of the United States if these ceilings or limits are established by these laws; or

Credit sales, loans or leases primarily for an agricultural purpose except as provided in article 2, part 6 and article 3, part 6 of this code.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 191, § 1-202; W.S. 1957, §

40-1-201

; Laws 1973, ch. 190, § 3; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

40-1-202

; Laws 1981, ch. 147, § 1; 1982, ch. 29, § 2; 1983, ch. 62, § 2; ch. 109, § 1; 2009, ch. 184, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “Except as required by W.S.

40-14-641

” at the beginning of the introductory language in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 40-14-140(a)(xxv).

Am. Jur. 2d. ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “business or commercial” purpose within meaning of § 104(1) of Truth in Lending Act (15 USC § 1603(1)), exempting business or commercial credit transactions from act, 54 ALR Fed 491.